District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
19 be cited as the "Closing ofa Portion of a Public Alley in Square 3524, S.O. 23-06402, Act of2025."
20 Sec. 2. Pursuant to Section 201 of the Street and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures Act of
21 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-20 I; D.C. Official Code §9-202.01 et seq) ("Act") the
22 Council finds that the portion of the public alley in Square 3524 shown on the Surveyor's plat filed under
23 S.O. 23-06402 is unnecessary for alley purposes and orders it closed, with title to the land to vest as
24 shown on the Surveyor's plat. The approval of the Council for the alley closing is contingent upon the
25 satisfaction of all the conditions set forth in the official S.O. 23-06402 file, including that prior to the
26 recordation of the plat by the Surveyor, the District Department of Transportation ("DDOT") shall
27 confirm that:
28 (a) DDOT has received from the owner of Lot 53 in Square 3524 the $4,265 cost of removing the
29 existing street lighting on the portion of the alley to be closed; and
30 (b) A Tree Protection Plan for the Special Tree located on the portion of the alley to be closed or a
31 permit to remove that Special Tree has been approved by DDOT's Urban Forestry Division.
32 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.

33 TheCouncil adoptsthe fiscal impactstatement preparedbythe ChiefFinancial Officerasthe
34 fiscal impactstatement requiredby section602(c)(3)ofthe DistrictofColumbia Home RuleAct,
35 approved December24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02 (c)(3))
36 Sec. 4. Effectivedate.
37 This act shall takeeffect upon itsapproval bytheMayor(or intheeventofveto by theMayor,
38 action bytheCounciltooverridetheveto)and a 30-dayof Congressional reviewasprovided in section
39 603(c)(1)ofthe District ofColumbia Home RuleAct, approved December24, 1973 (87 Stat813; D.C.
40 Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1),and publication inthe DistrictofColumbia Register.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA.
OfficeoftheAttorney General
K_ke.
ATTORNEYGENERAL.
haa
BRIAN L, SCHWALB
=e
PublicAdvocacyDivision
MEMORANDUM
TO: Nadia Williams, Associate Director
OfficeofPolicyand Legislative Affairs
Executive Office ofthe Mayor
FROM: Maximilian L.S. Tondro,Chief
Equitable Land Use Section
SUBJECT: Legal sufficiency review of a draft legislation entitled “Closing of a portion of a
public alley in Square3524, S.O. 23-06402, Act of2025”
DATE: May 7, 2025
This Officehas reviewedtheattachedproposed legislationand found ittobe legally sufficient forreview
by the Mayorand submission to the Council.
o O w n n S s e L p o t t em 5 b 3 er in 23 S , qu 2 a 0 r 2 e 3, 35 t 2 h 4 e , ow (t n h e e r “ o A f pp L l o i t c s a 5 n 2 t” a ) nd fil 8 e 0 d 2 an in a ‘ p S p q l u i a c r a e ti 3 o 5 n 24 w , it w h h t o he al O s f o fi c c o e nt o ro f l t s he th S e u e r n v t e it y y or th o at f
the District ofColumbia (the Surveyor”) proposing to:
* Close an approximately 20-foot-wide portion between Lots 52-54 and 802 ofSquare 3524 and Lot
892 in Square 3530.
‘The application includeda statementthatthe proposed alley closing would not displace retail tenants as
required by Section2oftheStreetandAlley ClosingandAcquisitionProceduresActof 1982 Relocation
Assistance Amendment Actof 1986, effective August 7, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-133; D.C. Official Code §
9-202.09(b)(5)).
Pursuant to Section 202 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982,
effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-202.02), the Surveyor drew a plat
depicting the proposed alley closing, with title to revert to the owner of Lot 53 in Square 3524. The
Surveyorcreatedafile(S.O. 23-06402) foralldocumentsrelevanttothe application andprovidednotice
ofthe proposal to:
* Districtagencies and public utilities;
© TheNational Capital Planning Commission (“NCPC”);
* Advisory Neighborhood Commission (“ANC”) SF, in which district the proposed alley closing is
located; and
* The ownersofthe lots abutting the portionofthe alley proposed to be closed that are not underthe
controloftheApplicant (Lot 54 in Square 3524 and Lot 892 in Square 3530) on February 14, 2025.
Agency responses
400 6" Street NW, Suite9100, Washington, DC20001 (202) 727-3400

‘The Departmentof HousingandCommunityDevelopment (“DHCD”)submitted a December 13, 2023,
letterto the Surveyor supporting the alley closing.
NCPC submitted a December 27, 2023, letter stating that the proposed alley closing fell under an
exemption from NCPC review.
The District’s Historic Preservation Office (“HPO”)submitted aJanuary 8, 2024, lettertothe Surveyor
stating that HPO has no comment on the proposed alley closing as not a street located in the L’Enfant
Street Plan.
ANC SF submitteda letter to the Surveyor stating that the ANC voted to support the proposed alley
closingat a regularly scheduled public meetingon July 15, 2024.
‘The District Department ofTransportation (“DDOT”) submitted a July 25, 2024, letter stating DDOT
has no objections to the proposed alley closing provided that the Applicant satisfies the following
conditions priorto the recordationofthe alley closingplat:
* Compensates DDOTfor the$4,265 cost to remove theexisting streetlights in the alley portion to be
closed;
* Receives final approval for the Planned Unit Development that would include the closed alley (the
January 31, 2025, publication ofZ.C. Order No. 23-24 satisfiedthis condition); and
* Obtained approval from DDOT’s Urban Forestry Division forthe treatmentofthe existing Special
Tree within thealley closing area, whethera Tree Protection Plan oratree removal permit.
The Department ofPublic Works’ Solid Waste Management Administration “SWMA”) submitted an
August 2, 2024, letter to the Surveyorstating no objection to the proposed alley closing.
The Fire and Emergency Services Department (“FEMS”) submitted a September 4, 2024, letterto the
Surveyor stating that FEMS has noobjections to the proposed alley closing.
The Office ofPlanning (“OP”) submitted a September 25, 2024, report to the Surveyor stating that OP
has no objections to the proposed alley closing.
The Officeofthe Chief Financial Officer(“OFCO”) submitted a May 3, 2025, Fiscal Impact Statement
stating that there were sufficient funds to implement the revised alley closing proposal in the District's
FY 2025 through FY 2028 budgetand financial plan.
Utility responses
Verizon submitted a December 14, 2023, letterto theSurveyorstatingthat Verizon has noobjections to
the alley closingproposal.
Pepco submitted a January 9, 2024, report to the Surveyor stating that Pepco has no objection to the
proposed alley closing.
The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC Water”) submitted a June 11, 2024, letter
statingthatDC Waterhas no facilities inthe portion ofthe alley proposed to beclosed and therefore has
no objections to theproposed alley closing.
20

Washington Gas submitted a July 3, 2024, letter to the Surveyor stating that Washington Gas has no
facilities in the portion ofthe alley proposed to be closed and therefore approves the proposed alley
closing.
Ifyou have any questions concerningthe legal sufficiency ofthe legislation, please contact me at 724-
6657.
(s/Max. LS. Tondro May 7, 2025
AssistantAttorney General
ce: Ramon Labrador, Surveyor fortheDistrict ofColumbia
Department ofBuilding
Adele El-Khouri, Deputy Attorney General,
Legal Counsel Division
Officeofthe Attorney General

eseSuvnds
eseauvnos
eseauvnos
2
169
TarSd
aa
ba
GY,
snraremm
"
(7/),
esesans
z
s
=
i
:
z
G
a
s
o
1
0
A
a
T
I
V
O
N
g
N
d

dcé
water is life” David L. Gadis, Chief Executive Officer
DISTRICT OFCOLUMBIA WATERAND SEWER AUTHORITY | 1385CANALSTREET,SE | WASHINGTON, DC20008
To: — Joseph Snider, D.C. Surveyor
D.C. Departmentof Buildings
Office ofthe Surveyor
1100 4th St, S.W., 4th Floor
Washington, DC 20024
From: Gordon Chike
Easement and CovenantCoordinator
CC: Vahid Bilvardi
Manager, PermitOperations
Date: June 11, 2024
Re: — RequestforComments—PublicAlley in Square 3524_S.O. 23-06402
Dear Mr. Snider:
The District ofColumbia Waterand SewerAuthority (DC Water) is in receiptofthe application and
plans forwarded to usforcomments on December 13, 2023, regarding commentsforS.0. 23-
06402. DCWater currently does notoperate ormaintain any facilitieswithin the ‘subject area.
Therefore, DC Water has no objection tothe proposed closing ofa public alley in Square 3524 as
shown in the provided plat map and geospatial image.
Ifyou have any questionsorneed additional information, | can be reached atthe contact
information listed below.
Regards,
Gordon Chike
Easementand Covenant Coordinator
jordon. I.
Office 202.787.2191
dcwater.com

6801IndustrialRoad
Washington
Springfield, Virginia2151
Gas
December 14, 2023
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
OfficeoftheSurveyor
11004" Street, S.W., RoomE320
Washington, D.C. 20024
Re: ProposedAlley Closurein Square 352~4 S.0, 23-0402
Mr. Snider,
havereviewedthealley closureapplication inthesubjectlocation detailed in theattachmentsto
thesubjectapplicationfiled by DC DepartmentofTransportation. Afterreviewingthearea, ithas been
determined thatWashington Gasdoes not haveactivenaturalgasfacilitieswithinthe limits ofthe
Proposed unimprovedalleywhich will beimpacted bythis proposal. Washington Gasapproves the Street
Purposededicationatthis location.
‘Should you haveanyquestionsorconcernsregardingthesefacilities,you maycontactme atthe
contactinformation provided below.
Sincerely,
AncdehbCiamepo
AndrésdelCampo
Washington Gas
Engineer|,DistributionEngineering
andres.delcampo@washgas.com
Mobile: 571-609-1868

VApepco
DistrictofColumbia Office pepeo.com ‘An Exelon Company
3400BenningRoad, NE
Washington,DC 20019
202-331-6237
January 09, 2024
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Departmentof Consumer & Regulatory Affairs
Offfice ofthe Surveyor forthe District of Columbia
11004iStreet, SW, Third Floor
Washington, DC 20024
Re: $.0. 23-06402
Square 3524
Dear Mr. Snider:
In responseto your Memorandum concerning the subjectproposed closing ofpublic alley for
square 3524 $.0. 23-06402, Pepco has reviewedthe documents and comments as follows:
* Pepco has no objectionto the revised proposal
Sincerely,
\NSpeec fi
Warren SpencerIl, PE
Supervisor Designers
Phone: 202-428-2065
Email:warren.spencerii@exeloncorp.com
EngineeringandDesignDC EngineeringandDes~iMgonnt.Co, Engineeringand Design-PGCo.
400BenningRoad, NE;Bid. #59 201 WestGudeDrive £8300Old ManboroPike
Washington, OC 20019-1803 Rockvile, Maryland20850 UpperMatboro,MD 20772
Tet: 202-331-6237/Fax 202-386-2721 Tot: 301-670-8700/Fax: 301-670-8718 “Te:301-967-5800/Fax301-967-5830

\—
evo ngnering verizon
OPPEMD/DC
13101 Columbia Pike, FDC 1
Floor I
SilverSpring, MD20904
December 14th,2023
Mr. JosephE. Snider
Officeofthe Surveyor
11004"Street SW.
Washington,D.C. 20024
RE: ProposedClosingofa PublicAlleyinSquare 3524~$.0.23-06402
Dear Mr. Snider:
InreferencetoyourletterdatedDecember 13th,2023
Location: Square3524 8.0. 23-06402
There arenoVerizonfacilitiesinthearea
VerizonWashington D.C.Inc. doesnotobjecttothisProposedClosingofaPublic
Alley
Verytrulyyours,
Kenneth Young
dGUiiKidePlantEngineering, WSAM
c.e.D.C.D.0.T. UndergroundLocation Section
‘AreaEngineer
File
wgfog

Government of the District of Columbia
Office ofthe Chief Financial Officer
xox
Sa
=
GlenLee
ChiefFinancialOfficer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The HonorablePhil Mendelson
Chairman,Councilofthe DistrictofColumbia
FROM: GlenLee M
ChiefFinancialOffi
DATE: May 3, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal ImpactStatement- ClosingofaPublicAlleyinSquare3524, 5.0.
23-06402,Actof2025
REFERENCE: DraftBillasprovidedtothe OfficeofRevenueAnalysison May2,2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2025 through fiscal year 2028 budget and financial plan to
implement thebill.
Background
A private development company, Eckington Mews LLC, and its owner, own properties located at 24
R Street, N.E,, 36R Street, N.E,, 38R Street, N.E., 1708 1* Street, N.E, and 1710 1* Street, N.E.t
Eckington Mewsplanstodeveloptwenty-sevenresidentialunitsacrossthefivepropertieswhichare
locatedwithina publicalleyparalleltoand northof RStreet,N.E.and along1*Street, N.E. To facilitate
the development, the developerhas applied for the closure ofapproximately, 1,125 square feetofa
publicalleyto theeastof38 R Street,N.E.andbehind theproperties located along 1*Street, N.E.
The bill approves the closure ofapproximately 1,125 square feet ofa public alley located between
thepropertiesownedbythedeveloper.Thisportionofthe publicalleydead-endsataDistrict-owned
property?andisnotusedfortransportationpurposesasthetwopropertiessitatdifferentelevations.
2Thesepropertiesare knownforassessmentandtax purposesasSquare3524,Lots800,803,802, 53,and
52,respectively.
2KnownforassessmentandtaxpurposesasSquare3530, Lot892.
1350PennsylvaniaAvenue, NW,Suite 203,Washington,DC20004(202)727-2476
www.cfo.de.gov

‘The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FiS:“Closingofa publicalleyinSquare 3524,8.0. 23-06402,Actof2025
Draftbillasprovidedtothe Office
ofRevenueAnalysison May2, 2025
FinancialPlan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2025 through fiscal year 2028 budget and financial plan to
implementthe bill.The closure of1,125 square feet ofa public alleywill revertand become taxable
to the adjacent properties which are owned by the developer. The 2026 real property tax
a $7 s 3 s 0 e , s 2 s 4 m 0 e , nt a s nd fo $ r 79 3 9 8 , R 170, St r r e e s e p t e , ct N i . v E. e , ly. 17 T 0 h 8 e 1 Of % fi S c t e re o e f t, Ta N x .E a ., nd an R d ev 1 e 7 n 1 u 0 ew 1 i s l t l S a t s r s e e e s t, st N h .E e . ap a p r r e op $ r 3 i 2 a 2 t , e 02 t 0 a , x
amountsforthealleyspace uponits closure.
The property owner has agreed, as a condition ofthe closure, to pay the District Department of
Transportation (DDOT) $4,265 torelocate streetlightinfrastructure locatedwithinthe closure area.
DDOT will deposit these funds into the Transportation Infrastructure Project Review Fund3 to pay
forthe relocation.
2TransportationInfrastructureandPublicSpace ImpactMitigationAmendmentActof2014, effectiveJuly23,
2014(D.C. Law20-128; D.C. OfficialCode§50-921.17),
Page 2 of2

District ofColumbia’
Offof iPlacnnieng,
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph E. Snider, RLS, DC Surveyor
Officeofthe Surveyor
FROM: Matthew Jesick, Development Review Specialist
oct Lawson, Associate Director, Development Review
DATE: September 25, 2024
SUBJECT: _ S.0. 23-06402—Eckington Mews
Proposed ClosingofPortion of a Public Alley in Square 3524
L RECOMMENDATION
The Office ofPlanning (OP) has completed its review ofthe application for the requested alley
closing and has no objection to this request.
IL REQUEST
To close aportion ofthe alley in Square 3524, asshown in the map belowand on the nextpage.
E
N
,
t
e
r
e
t
S
t
s
A
RStreet,NE
*
phone 202-442-7600, fax 202-535-2497 WeAne
FindusonFacebookorfollowusan Twitter@OPinDC Bc

OPReporton Allley ClosingRequest, 8.0. 23-06402, Square 3524
‘September25, 2024 Page2of7
Portion ofAlley
ProposedforClosure
Applicant Brian Brown, owner
Address 1710 1 Street, NE
Legal Description| Square 3524, Lots 52, 53 and 802
Ward / ANC Ward 5; ANC SF
Zone RF-1 — Moderate density rowhouses and flats
Zoning Commission PUD #23-24, approved September 12, 2024, which
included a PUD-related map amendment to RA-2, moderate density
residential
Historic Di None
Description ‘The20 foot-wide alley iscurrently useableand has been used to accessthe
two rowhouses, owned by the applicant, fronting onto 1* Street NE.
Size Not provided with the application materials, OP estimates approximately
1,125 square feet to be closed.
‘Adjacent The District ofColumbia owns the property directly to the north, but that
Ownership lot isatahigherelevation and separatedfrom thealleyby aretainingwall.
Aresidential rowhouse sharesthesubject alley, butthe portionofthealley
that serves that lot would remain open.
Proposed 27 total residential units, with a total floor area of about 42,700 square
Development feet. The form ofdevelopmentwould be rowhouseswitheitherone or two
units. Pedestrian entrances would be from 1* Street or from a walkway on
the north sideofthe property. Vehicularaccess would be from the existing
alley on the south sideofthe site.
IV. SUBMISSION REQUIREMENTS,
24 DCMR, Chapter 14, the street and alley closing regulations, requires submi
following:

OPReportonAlleyClosingRequest, 8.0. 23-06402, Square3524
ptember25, 2024 Page3of7
(4 Alisting of all properties (land and buildings) associated with the proposed
closing:
Provided. The subject lots abuttingthe alley are Square 3524, Lots 52, 53 and 802.
() A listing ofthe name and location ofeach retail tenant that will be displaced
because of the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, or discontinuance of an
existing buildingthat is associatedwith the closing:
N/A
OD Six (6) setsof the site developmentplan meetingthe requirementsof§§1400.7and
1400.8 for all applications.
Provided.
24 DCMR§1400.8 requires the site development planto include the following so thatreviewing
agencies can determinethepotential impactofthe requested closing:
(@) The Office ofthe Surveyor's applicationfile number;
23-06402
(6) A key location sketch showing the development in relationship to the square and
surroundingstreets, with the streets identified;
Provided.
(©) Footprint oroutline ofeach buildingof theproposeddevelopment;
Provided
(@) Thestreet names;
Provided.
(€) The alley orstreetoportion thereofproposed to be closed; andthe location and
dimensionsofany dedication or easementproposed, alongwith a clearstatement
ofthepurposesforthe easement;
Provided.
QO The approximate grossfloor areas intendedfor various usessuch as retail, office,
residential, industrial, andcommercial;
Not provided with alley closing application. The PUD application indicatesthat the alley closing
would facilitate redevelopment ofthe site into 27 total residential units, with atotal floorarea on
the entire site, including the current street fronting and alley lot and the area ofthe alley to be
closed, ofabout 42,700 square feet.
(3) The points of ingress and egress that vehicles will usefor parking or loading
purposes;
Not provided. The PUD application indicates that all vehicular access would be from the
remaining alley system.
(h) The locationof off-streetparkingspacesandtheirnumberand size;
Notprovided. The PUD applicationindicatesthat 13 vehicularparkingspaceswould provided for
the proposed development, as partof the individual rowhouses and flats.

OPReporton Alley ClosingRequest, $.0. 23-06402, Square 3524
‘September25, 2024
Page4 of7
() Thelocationand size ofloadingandunloadingfacilitiessuchasberths, docks, and
platforms;
NA
@ Tracking diagramfor the maximum size trucks intended to use the loading and
unloadingfacilities;
N/A
(k) Elevation viewsfor each sideof anybuildingproposedfor thesite; and
Not provided. The design ofthe project was reviewed indetail as partofthe PUD application.
() A profile drawingof the easement to clearly show theproposedsurface grade of
the easement and the ceiling level ofany building to be constructed over the
easement.
NA
V. ANALYSIS
The Directorofthe OfficeofPlanning is required to “determine whethertheproposedclosing is
in compliance with the District's planning and urban design objectives”, as per 24 DCMR
1401.2(c). ‘Those objectives are primarily contained in the District’s Comprehensive Plan (10
DCMR).
A full reviewofthe proposal against the Comprehensive Plan was provided by the applicant and
by OP as part ofthe Zoning Commission review ofthe now approved PUD forthis site. As part
ofthat review, the Commission determined that, on balance, the proposal is not inconsistent with
the Comprehensive Plan and would further many policy objectives for the area and the City as a
whole.
Comprehensive Plan Land Use Maps
The site is within an area designated on the Comprehensive Plan Policy Map as a Neighborhood
Conservation Area, and designated on the Future Land Use Map (FLUM) for Local Public
Facilities. The proposal is not inconsistent with these designations. A property with a FLUM
designation of Local Public Facilities can be redeveloped in conformity with the character of
surrounding areas, in this case rowhouses with a FLUM designation of Moderate Density
Residential
Comprehen: Plan Written Elements
The planning and urban design objectives, as contained withinthe Comprehensive Plan include
Land Use Element
Policy LU-2.2.7:Alley Use
Discourage the conversionofalleys intoprivateyardsordevelopable landwhen thealleys
arepartofthehistoricfabricoftheneighboarnhdwoouoldd otherwisecontinue toperform
their intendedfunctions, such as access to rear garages and service areas for trash

OP Reporton Alley ClosingRequest, $.0.23-06402, Square3524
September25, 2024
Page5of7
collection. ....3118
While a small portionofthe alley would be closed, the larger alley system would remain in use
and continue to serve its function ofproviding access for vehicle parking and services, including
for the new development. The development facilitated by the alley closing would blend in with
the historic fabric of the neighborhood by replicating a rowhouse building pattern at a scale
consistent with the surroundingneighborhood.
Urban Design Element
Overview
The critical urban design issuesfacing Washington, DC are addressed in this element.
These include.
* Affirming civic identity through afocus on the historic intentionof the District's
design;
+ Strengthening neighborhood quality of life while accommodating growth and
change;
+ Providing compatible infill development and appropriate transitions between
varyinguses anddensities;
* Supportinga vibrant urban life thatenhances the accessibility, performance, and
beautyofpublicstreets andspaces; and
+ Realizing design excellence and innovation in architecture, infrastructure, and
publicspaces to elevate the humanexperience ofthe builtenvironment. 9002
Urban Design Goal
The overarchinggoalfor urbandesign in theDistrictis to enhance the beauty, equity, and
livabilityofWashington, DCbyreinforcingitshistoricdesignlegacyandthe identityof its
neighborhoods and centers, harmoniously integrating new construction with existing
buildings and the natural environment, and improving the vitality, appearance, and
functionofstreets andpublicspaces. 901.1
The proposed development would strengthen the quality of life in the neighborhood by
redeveloping a vacant lot, bringing more eyes to the alley, and providing housing and affordable
housing in the neighborhood. The project would be designed to be compatible with the existing
neighborhood both in scale and in type of housing, and it should enhance the vibrant urban life
and beauty ofthe community.
Policy UD-1.1.8: Community Life inAlleys
Promote the useof the historic alleyway systems as multipurpose spaces that meet
utilitarian needs and can provide additional housing, support community life, and use
approaches such as green alley treatments, and controlled vehicular access. Strongly
discourage the closureofalleywaysfor whole blockdevelopment. 903.18
The partial alley closing would allow for redevelopment of an underuti d alley lot while
‘maintainingthe utilitarian function ofthe overall alley system.
Policy UD2.1.6:MinimizeMid-Block Vehicular Curb Cuts
Curb cutsshouldbe avoidedonstreets with heavypedestrian usage andminimizedon all

OPReporton AlleyClosing Request, S.O, 23-06402, Square3524
‘September25, 2024 Page6of7
other streets. Where feasible, alleys should be used in lieu of curb cuts for parking and
loadingaccess to buildings. Curb cutsforindividual residences shouldonly be allowedif
there is apredominantpatternofcurb cuts anddrivewayson the blockface. 908.
The proposed development would utilize the existing alley system for all vehicular access. The
portion ofthe alley to be closed would still partially serve to provide access to parking forone or
moreofthe units. On 1* Street, the project would maintain the two existing rowhouses facing the
street and the pedestrian environmentofthe street. ‘The closing would not restrict alley access to
all other lots fronting streets on this square.
Mid:
Are: ment
Section 2007.3: PlanningandDevelopmentPriorities
© The unique character that defines Mid-City neighborhoods should be preserved as
infilldevelopmenttakesplace.
* Housingopportunities shouldbe increasedforpeople atall income levelsso thatMid-
City can remain a diverse neighborhood....Thetype ofnew housingbeing built in the
area should be more varied. Inparticular, more three- andfour-bedroom units are
neededtoattractandretain families.
Policy MC-1.1.1: NeighborhoodConservation
Retain and reinforcethe historiccharacterofMid-Cityneighborhoods,particularly itsmix
ofrow houses, apartmenthouses, as well as historic districts, and walkable neighborhood
shopping districts. The PlanningArea's squares, alleyways, and historic alley lots offer
opportunitiesfor preservation and creative development, The area’s rich architectural
heritage andculturalhistory shouldbepreservedandenhanced. 2008.2
PolicyMC-1.1.3: InfillandRehabilitation
Encourage redevelopment ofvacant lots and the rehabilitation ofabandoned structures
within the community, particularlyalong Georgia AvenueNW, Florida Avenue NW, 11th
Street NW, andNorth Capitol Street NW andin the Shaw, Bloomingdale, andEckington
communities, Similarly, encouragethe redevelopmentofvacant lots andthe rehabilitation
of vacant buildings located at the interiors of the Planning Area's squares. Infill
development should be compatible in scale and character with adjacent uses and
encourage more housingopportunities. 2008.4
Policy MC-1.1.5: Conservation ofRowHouse Neighborhoods
Recognize the value and importance of Mid-City's row house neighborhoods as an
essentialpartof thefabric ofthe local community. Ensure that the Comprehensive Plan
and zoning designationsforthese neighborhoodsreflect the desire toretain the row house
architecturalpattern. Zoningandpolicy in Mid- City’s row house neighborhoods should
seek to maintain andaugment the mixof large andsmall unitsizes andopportunitiesfor
both homeownership and renting, as exemplified by the use of English basements as
separate dwelling units. See Policy LU-2.1.7 and Policy LU-2.1.9for more guidance on
alterationsto row houses. 2008.6
The approved PUD would provide a more attractive use than the current vacant lot, providing a
rowhouse typology thatwould relate to existingrowhouses across the alley in a manner consistent

OPReporton AlleyClosingRequest, $.0.23-06402,Square3524
jeptember25, 2024
Page7of7
with DC neighborhoods. The project would also generally be compatible with the rowhouse
pattern ofthe area. New residents would add eyes on the alley, and increase the amount of24-
hour activity aroundthe site, improvingsafety inthe neighborhood. ‘The proposal would increase
housingopportunities forhouseholdsofvarious sizes, including affordable family-sized housing.
Housing Linkage
IM-3.4 CommercialLinkage2514
Thehousinglinkageobjectiverequiresapplicantswhoobtainanincreaseofnonresidential
squarefootage -- as a resultof providing habitable non-residentialpenthouse space, of
obtaining a discretionary street or alley closing, or ofobtaining a discretionary zoning
densityincrease --toproducehousingorcontributefundstotheHPTF. Theamountbased
onaformula tiedto the amountor valueof theadditionalsquarefootage obtained. 25141
The proposed alleyclosingwould facilitate development approved by the Zoning Commission in
PUD #23-24. The approved project would provide only residential units(27 residential units and
42,700squarefeet)and nocommercialspace. Pursuantot §2514.11,therefore,theprojectenabled
by the requested alley closing would not be subject to the commercial linkage requirement.
b Fu e r r t e h s e e r r m v o e r d e , , t a h b r o o u u t gh 1 t 1 h % e of I t Z h p e ro r g e r s a i m de , nt f i o a r l h f o l u o s or eh a o r l ea ds (e e q a u r i n v i a n l g en l t es t s o t t h h a r n ee 6 f 0 am % il o y f - t s h i e ze M d F u I nit — s) a w n o a u r l e d a
and level ofaffordability greaterthan thatrequired by zoning.

Government of the District of Columbia
DC Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department
|
‘MurielBowsor JohnA. Donnelly,Sr.
Mayor Fireand EMSChie!
FIRE PREVENTION DIVISION
Dabney S. Hudson
AssistantFire Marshal
1100 4" Street SW, Suite E700
Washington, DC, 20024
September4, 2024
Re: Surveyor’s Office File No, SO 23-06402
Joseph E. Sinder
DC Surveyor
1100 4" Street SW
Washington DC, 20024
The Fire Marshal’s office has reviewed the submitted request to close a portion ofthe alley
in square 3524. Based on our review, the Officeofthe Fire Marshall has no objection to this
request and approves the plansassubmitted.
Respectfully,
(Lbaof Hid
Dabney S. Hudson
Assistant Fire Marshal
OfficeoftheFireMarshal phone: (202)727-1614
11004th Street, SW, SuiteE700 facsimile (202)462-0807
‘Washington, DC20024 website: foms.de.gov
ND 2
—“*

1725 15th StreetNE
SolidWaste
Washington DC, 20002
ManagementAdministration = (202)645-3900
GOVERNMEONFTTHE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA
DepartmentofPublicWorks
SolidWaste ManagementAdministration
MEMORANDUM,
To: JosephSnider
Surveyor, D.C.
From:
Deputy AdministratorSWMA,DPW
Subject:SUBJECT: Proposed Closing ofa PublicAlley in Square 3524 - $.0, 23 - 06402
Date: August2,2024
This projectwillnotcausea negativeenvironmental impactifprojectdevelopersandownersare
followingapplicable lawsand regulationsgoverning solidwastemanagementduringall phasesofthe
project.
Should you have anyquestionsyoucan contact me byemail at; reginald.may2@de.gov. |amavailable
bytelephoneon (202-645-3900),

DistrictofColumbiaOfficeofPlanning
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph E. Snider, Officeofthe Surveyor
SUBJECT: Proposed Alley Closing in Square 3524 (S.O. 23-06402)
DATE: January 8, 2024
Thankyou forcontacting the DC Historic Preservation Office regardingthe above-referenced alley
closure. Section 9-202.02(4)ofthe DC Code requires the Mayorto referapplications“to close any
street located on the L’Enfant Street Plan” to the Historic Preservation Review Board (HPRB). We
have no commenton the proposed actionsince itdoes not involve any streets that are located on the
L’Enfant Street Plan.
BY:
Senjbr Historic Preservation Specialist
DC State Historic Preservation Office
24-0188
1100 4%Street,S.W., Suite E650, Washington, D.C. 20024 Phone: 202-442-76F0a0x:202-442-7638

wa
==
=
GOVERNMENTOF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENTOFHOUSINGANDCOMMUNITYDEVELOPMENT
ake
MEMORANDUM
TO: Mr. Joseph E. Snider.
Surveyor of the Districtof Columbia
FROM: oarony G. Lee
Supervisory Construction Analyst
DATE: December 13, 2023
RE: ProposedAlley ClosingBehind Square 3524, Lots 0052, 0053 and 0802 (File
No.: SO-23-06402)
SUBJECT:
Thank you for contacting the DC Department of Housing and Community Development
(DHCD) regarding the requested Square 3524 alley closure behind Lots 0052, 0053 and 0802
‘The Ownerofthe two properties (1710 I* St., NE — Lots 0052, and 0802; ManagingMember of
Eckington Mews, LLC, Owner— Lot 0053) submitted the application for the alley closure. We
appreciate the opportunityto review and provide inputon this proposedaction, relative any ofour
current and potential future housing development projects in the vicinityofI* St., NE, LincolnRd.,
NE andRSt., NE.
DHCD has reviewed the included “Notice to agencies,” “SO-23-06402 Draft Plat,” Purpose of
Application (Sep. 19, 2023,” “Application— Square 3524,” “Additional Information (Drawing),”
“Letter ofSupport,” “Site Plans,” and “Sketch” documents and finds no adverse impact to any
current development projects or to any proposed future project applications relative to this
proposed alleyclosure within Square 3524. DHCD takes no exception or objection regarding
this alley closure application. Our agency's support ofthis proposed closure is based upon our
review ofthe documents and application provided.
DepartmentofHousianngdCommunityDevelopment|1800MartinLuKitng.hAevenrue,SEWashington, 0¢20020| 202.442.7200|heddegov

& =
E
i
l o y5> 53 r o
a
s
t
a
t
s i v o l e v 9 1 a s 6= s i e v o o v 1
n
a
n
aS a
Y “ s
) rW 8 2 l a | 3 . f S t e s 5 ) i
o
n
o 6= e S a o s e
z z z L z z n
a
§ i
S
A
S
O
d
u
N d
A
J
A b T l
I e
V A
Y
Y
V
O
N
S O
S
N
O
I
L
V
O
I
G
S
a
G

Government of the District of Columbia
Department ofTransportation
d=
4d. Planningand Sustainability Division
MEMORANDUM
To: Joseph Snider
DCSurveyor
Officeofthe Surveyor, Department ofBuildings
FROM: Anna Chamberlin, AICP yg 7
Associate Director
DATE: July25, 2024
SUBJECT: S.0. No. 23-0640—2AlleyClosure in Square3524 (Eckington Mews)
The District Department ofTransportation (DDOT) has reviewedthe application materialsprovided bytheOffice
of theSurveyor. The purposeofthis memorandumisto provide DDOT’s comments onthe proposed closure and
dedication.
OVERVIEW
Brian Brown (the“Applicant”seeksto closeanexistingpublicalleywithinSquare3524to facilitatethe
development of26residential units. This development project isunder reviewbytheZoningCommission (ZC)
forPlanned Unit Development(PUD)approval (ZC Case No. 23-24). Thedevelopmentsite is bounded by
MckinleyTechnologyHighSchoolto the north, publicalleystothewestand south,and FirstStreetNE tothe
east.
OPERATIONS
Thesite currently containsa 20-footdead-end publicalleythat runsnorth-southfrom the retainingwallatthe
southern edgeofthe McKinleyTechnology High School campustotheeast-westalleythat forms thesouthern
borderofthe developmentsite. Duetothis retainingwall andagradedifferenceofroughlyeight (8)feet, the
alleydoes notprovidevehicularorpedestrianaccess totheschoolcampus. Thealleyserves four properties in
Square 3524: Lots52,53and 802, whichareownedbytheApplicant, and Lot54, which is notowned bythe
Applicant.
‘The Applicant proposestoclose 1,125 squarefeetofthisalley betweentheschooland thesouthernedge ofLot
53. To retain publicaccessto Lot 54,a 360square-footsectionofalley immediatelysouthofthisclosure area
DistrictDepartmentofTransportation | 250MStreetSE,Washington,DC20003 | 202.673.6813 | ddot.de.gov

5.0. No. 23-06402~AlleyClosureinSquare 3524(EckingtonMews)
and northoftheeast-west alleywill remain public right-of-way. DDOThas determined thatthere is no longera
transportation needforthe portionof the 1,125square-foot segmentofalleyto be closed. The proposed
closure is shown in Figure 1 below.
Figure 1 | DraftPlat
SQUARE 3530
892 SQUARE 3530
891
802
,
T
E
E
R
T
a PUBLIC ALLEY ® S
t
s
1
Source: OfficeoftheSurveyor
DEVELOPMENTPROPOSAL
AsofJuly2024, theApplicant is undergoingthe PUD processthrough ZCCase No. 23-24to redevelopthe
existing rowhomes, garages, andvacant lots on site with 26 residential unitsas partof the Eckington Mews
project. Pedestrian accesstothenew developmentwill occur from the existing alleystothe south and westof
thesite, the remaining public portionofthealleyto be closed, and FirstStreet NE. Vehicularaccesswill occur

5.0. No, 23-6402-AlleyClosureinSquare3524(EckingtonMews)
from theeast-west alleyandthepartially closed north-south alley. Figure 2 below depicts theproposed site
layout.
Figure 2 | ProposedSite Layout
z
: Re
r
TR
a
EEYALLEY
a e 768 L
I
Source:Officeofthe Surveyor
‘STREETSCAPEAND PUBLIC REALM
In linewith District policyandpractice, any substantialnew buildingdevelopment orrenovation is
expectedtorehabilitate streetscape infrastructurebetweenthecurbandtheproperty lines. This
includescurband gutters, streettreesandlandscaping, streetlights,sidewalks, andotherappropriate
featureswithinthe public rightsofway borderingthesite.
TheApplicant mustcontinuetoworkcloselywith DDOTandtheOfficeofPlanning (OP)toensurethat
thedesignofallproposed improvements within publicspace meetscurrent DDOTstandards andwill
substantially upgradethe appearanceandfunctionalityofthestreetscapeforpublicusers needingto
accessthe propertyorcirculatearound it.
HERITAGE AND SPECIAL TREES.
AccordingtotheDistrict'sTreeSizeEstimatormap, thesitehasone (1) Special Treewithin publicspacealong
FirstStreet NE. There alsoappearstobean additionalSpecialTreeatthe northern endofthealleyareato be
closedwhich is not capturedonthe map. DDOTrecommendsthattheApplicant coordinatewiththeWard 5
Arborist regardingthe preservationand protectionofthesetreesandotherexisting streettrees in additionto
plantingnewstreet trees in bioretentionfacilities oratypicalexpandedtree planting space.
SpecialTrees are between44 inches and99.99inches in circumference. SpecialTreesmay beremovedwitha
permit. However, ifaSpecialTreeisdesignated toremain by Urban Forestry Division, aTree ProtectionPlan
(TPP) will be required.

5.0. No. 23-06402—AlleyClosureinSquare3524(EckingtonMews)
DDOTASSETS
DOT requirestheApplicantto compensatethe Districtfortheremovalofexisting DDOTassets inthe areaof
the proposed alleyclosure. Figure3 belowshowsthelocationofthese existingDDOTassets, andAttachment 1
provides a detailed breakdown ofassociated costs, whichtotal$4,265.00.
Figure3 | DDOTAssets in ExistingAlley
g ah em
3 ite coal a
e he
be a
Lie f ‘ Streetlight
> arr z _ P ole#5970 4
Fe aA >! ! o «Conduit To
fe Kg ‘ i Path-—>
or
| lity? <n he Pa
Pa “ . * GLElectrical
x7pee 3528 Manhole
en: fi di dd dedde dddddddd ddddd
He gt, all FL | fel Jed Sh
= | Tee a
Source: DDOT Streetlight Division
RECOMMENDATION
DDOThas determinedthatthere is no longera transportation needforthe alley area to beclosed, DDOTis,
supportive ofmoving forward with legislationtoclosethealley butobjectstothe recordationofthealley
closure plat until the followingconditionsare satisfied:
* The Applicant compensates DDOTin theamountof $4,265.00forthestreetlightfacilities in theexisting
alley network;
* The Applicant receives PUDapproval from theZC,formalizingthe developmentproposal; and
‘+ TheApplicantdemonstratesthatthey have received approval fora TPPortree removal permitsforthe
SpecialTree within thealleyclosurearea
can

5.0. No. 23-06402~AlleyClosureinSquare3524 (EckingtonMews)
ATTACHMENTS
1) Engineering EstimateforStreetlight Work

xk ok
a= GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
SSS
ADVISORY NEIGHBORHOOD COMMISSION 5F
ANC 5F
RESOLUTION IN SUPPORTOFZC #23-24 ECKINGTON MEWS
ANCS5F-25-100
PO. Box91843 Sponsor: CommissionerBishop-Henchman
Washington,DC 20090
Sf@anc.cccox WHEREAS, on October6, 2023, the applicant filed in ZC #23-24 seekinga
@ANCEF
consolidated PUD and related map amendment from RF-1 to RA-2 to
COMMISSIONERS construct 26 multi-bedroom residential units in for-sale rowhomes, at a
maximum heightof34 feet and including 13 vehicle spaces, and including
TonyHurst aprofferofaffordable housing in the form ofIZ units; and
Treasurer
5E01@anc.de.cov WHEREAS, on October 16, 2023, theZoning Commission notified ANC SF andthe
5F07 Commissionerandwelcomed a written submission on the
Aru Sahn!
application; and
‘5£02@anc.dc.cov
Patricia Williams WHEREAS, on October23, 2023, the Eckington Civic Association voted to supportthe
ViceChair application, praising the applicant’s“efforts to responsibly expand the
housing supply”; and
‘SfOS@anc.degov
Mark Galvan
on October 24, 2023, the applicantpresented to theANC SF regular
WHEREAS,
‘SFO4@anc.de.gov meetingand answered questions from commissioners andthe community,
JenniferAnderson on apartments vs. rowhouses, yards, garages, alleyway dumping,
Chair affordability, cameras, homeowners associations, MPD, lighting, street
‘2fS@enc.de,gov naming, alleyclosing, numberofbedrooms, streetfrontage, pedestrian
aceess, trash collection, roof, shadows, airconditioning units, fire hydrant
Joe Bishop-Henchman
access, traffic, bike racks, and othertopics; and
Secretary
‘5f06@enc.de.gov WHEREAS, on January29, 2024,the Office of Planning(OP)produced its setdown
Sylvia Pinkney report, describingthe application and identifying four areas foraction
‘SFD7@anc.de.gov (clarify brick details, possibility ofsolar panels, provide section drawings,
and finalize IZ flexibility); and
WHEREAS, on March 26, 2024, and again on June 18, 2024, the applicantsubmitted
transportation statements and made itavailable for input from all agencies
including ANC SF; and
WHEREAS, on May 22, 2024,the ZoningCommission gave notice that the project
would be considered at its meeting on July 18, 2024, published thatnotice
inthe D.C, Register and mailed notice to all residentswithin 200 feet of
the project, and specifically welcomed the submission ofcomments by
ANC SF; and
WHEREAS, on May 22, 2024, the ZoningCommission gave notice that the project
would be considered attheZC meeting on July 18, 2024, published that
ADVISORYNEIGHBORHOODCOMMISSION5FSERVESTHECOMMUNITIESOFECKINGTONANDEDGEWOOD.

notice in the D.C, Registerand mailed notice toall residents within 200
feetofthe project, and specifically welcomed the submission ofcomments
by ANC 5F; and
WHEREAS, on May 24, 2024, the applicant spoke with the OfficeofPlanning and the
Department ofHousing & Community Development, and on June 11,
2024with the Department ofTransportation, the DepartmentofParks &
Recreation,the D.C. Fire & Emergency Medical Services Department, and
DC Water, and at various points with ANC SF commissioners;
WHEREAS, on June 28, 2024, asa result ofthese discussions, the applicant filed a
supplemental reportto setaside Townhouse 12 as IZ at 80% ofmedian
family income, and Townhouses 13 and 15 at 60%ofmedianfamily
income, and verified that it will offerall the IZ units forsale; and
WHEREAS, on July 5, 2024, the OfficeofPlanning submitted an updated report
recommending the approval ofthe application; and
WHEREAS, on July 8, 2024, the District DepartmentofTransportation submitted a
report stating no objection to the application so long as it incorporates the
transportation statementsubmitted onJune 18, 2024; and
WHEREAS, on July 8, 2024, the Officeofthe Attorney General submitted a report
supporting the application, referring to its “significant affordable housing”
and helpingaddress the city’s affordable housingcrisis, need fordeeply
affordable units (60% MFI), the need foraffordable home-ownership
units, the need for family-sized units; and
WHEREAS, asofJuly 15, 2024, five public comments have been submitted tothe
Zoning Commission onthis application, all in support, and also on that
date, the applicant presented again to ANC SF;
THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that ANC 5F supports the application in ZC #23-24
(Eckington Mews and alley closure) forthe above-stated reasons and
respectfully requests thatthe Zoning Commission give great weightto this
determination; and
BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the sponsorofthis resolution is directed to transmit a
copyofthis resolution to appropriate recipientsand is au thori
representthemselasf speakingon behalfofthe SF Comi
advocating for the aforementioned.
This resolution came beforeANC SFat aduly noticed public meeting on July15,2024
ANCSF is composed of7Commissioners, so that4 Commissioners constitutea quorum,
With 7___ Commissioners present, ANC SF voted 5 Yea, 1__Nay,and 1__ Abstain.
Attest:
c a. ANC SF atANC SF

401.9°SueeNtW. NorthLobby,Suite500 Washingion,0¢20008 Te!202.482.7200 Fax202.482.7272 www.nepegov
IN REPLY REFER TO:
NCPC File No. 8513
December27, 2023,
Joseph Snider
DistrictofColumbiaDepartment ofBuildings, Officeofthe Surveyor
1100 4thStreet, SW
Washington, DC 20024
Re: 8513 (ProposedClosingofa PublicAlley in Square3524- 8.0. 23-06402)
DearMr. Snidé
The purposeofthis letter is to respond tothe above-mentioned project submitted to the National Capital
PlanningCommission(NCPC)forreview, inaccordancewith DC Code § 9-202.02.
Upon reviewoftheprojectdocuments,NCPCstaffhas determined thatthe proposedproject falls underan
exception listed in Chapter 8 (Exceptions and Project Changes) of NCPC’s submission guidelines. In
particular, the project meets the requirements ofexception 8, which include the street or alley closings
located outside the boundary ofthe L’Enfant City underthe following conditions: 1) the street or alley is
notadjacenttofederal property; 2)thestreetoralleydoesnotprovideaccesstoafederal property oraffect.
other federal interests. The subject alleydoes not provide access to any federal property, and it is located
outside thehistoricL’EnfantCity boundary. The projectwas alsomadeavailable forpublic reviewon the
NCPC website and no comments were received. Accordingly, staffhas determined that this project is
‘exempt fromCommissionreview.
This determination applies only to the project listed above. Determinations towhether a particular project
falls within one ofthe Commission's exceptions are done on a case-by-case basis, either during early
consultation or upon request for review. Please note that the applicant cannot makethis determination
independentlyand mustsubmit projectsto NCPCtoconfirmthatanexception iswarranted.
Ifyou have any questions or need additional information, please contact Matthew Flis at(202) 482-7236
or matthew.flis@nepc.gov.
Sincerely,
Diane Sullivan
Diane Sullivan
Director, UrbanDesign and Plan Review

September11, 2023,
Brian Brown
1241 NewJersey AveNW
Washington DC20001
‘ToWhomitmayconcern:
'Brian Brownamtheownerof17101*StNE(Square3524,Lot0052)aswellasthealleylot (Square
3524Lot0802)
Jamalsothe managingmemberofEckingtonMewsLLCwhich owns17081*StreetNE. (Square3524
Lot0053)
1amsupportiveofclosingthe publicalley betweenthesethree properties.Ifyouhaveanyquestions |
canbe reachedat202-255-5495
Ban
Brian Brown

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department ofConsumer and RegulatoryAffairs
OfficeoftheSurveyor
a
AR
NOTICE OF APPLICATION
TO
CLOSE A STREET OR ALLEY
TO: District ofColumbia Date: February 14, 2025
File No. 23-06402
1735 LINCOLN RD, NE
WASHINGTON, DC 20002
An application has been filed in theOffice ofthe Surveyor for:
Proposed Closing ofa Public Alley in Square 3524, S.O. 23-06402, Act of2024
This notice is requiredpursuant to Section 9-202.02(6) ofthe D.C. Code ofLaw because you are
an ownerofproperty abutting the abovepublic alley system affected by this proposal.
For further information on this proposal, you may contact the Office ofthe Surveyor at Diana
Dorsey Hill, Program Specialist at (202) 718-8166. Please refer to the above refer to the S.O.
File Number.
Sincerely,
one!) fill
Ramén Labrador
Deputy Surveyor, D.
Square(s): 3530
Lot(s): 0892
11004"Street, S.W.,3 Floor, Washington,D.C. 20024

—
a
-
0
e9
0
e%
2
btmoweeonsure)
om
+
tanaceonono
oo
crimroite2e9
maracaresVED
s
e
W c
s
i
d
ee
t i r
o
s n
a o
s s
2 y
0
e
y e l
p
o a
u
]
hET2 G@T# OOOO DESO etOe
E
C
S
e
e
r
B
o a
)

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department ofConsumer and Regulatory Affairs
Officeofthe Surveyor
a te
LDC
NOTICE OFAPPLICATION
TO
CLOSE A STREET ORALLEY
TO: Date: February 14, 2025
MICHAEL SESSA File No. 23-06402
1706 IST ST, NE
WASHINGTON, DC 20002
An application has been filed in the Officeofthe Surveyor for:
Proposed Closingof a Public Alley in Square 3524, S.O. 23-06402, Act of2024
This notice is required pursuantto Section 9-202.02(6) ofthe D.C. Code ofLaw because you are
an ownerofproperty abutting the above public alley system affectedby this proposal.
For further information on this proposal, you may contact the Office ofthe Surveyor at Diana
Dorsey Hill, Program Specialist at (202) 718-8166. Please refer to the above refer to the S.0.
File Number.
Sincerely,
ome!
‘Ramén Labrador
Deputy Surveyor, D.C,
Square(s): 3524
Lot(s): 0054
11004*Street, S.W.,3°Floor, Washington,D.C. 20024

E
e
e
aci
BRIE 9TbS 000 oTS2 Tone